Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-2717
Appropriations; restrictions.

(1) No city of the metropolitan class or primary class shall appropriate from funds derived directly from local sources of revenue more than five million dollars for all approved economic development programs in any one year, no city of the first class shall appropriate from funds derived directly from local sources of revenue more than four million dollars for all approved economic development programs in any one year, and no city of the second class or village shall appropriate from funds derived directly from local sources of revenue more than three million dollars for all approved economic development programs in any one year.

(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (1) of this section, no city shall appropriate from funds derived directly from local sources of revenue an amount for an economic development program in excess of the total amount approved by the voters at the election or elections in which the economic development program was submitted or amended.

(3) The restrictions on the appropriation of funds from local sources of revenue as set out in subsections (1) and (2) of this section shall apply only to the appropriation of funds derived directly from local sources of revenue. Sales tax collections in excess of the amount which may be appropriated as a result of the restrictions set out in such subsections shall be deposited in the city's economic development fund and invested as provided for in section 18-2718. Any funds in the city's economic development fund not otherwise restricted from appropriation by reason of the city's ordinance governing the economic development program or this section may be appropriated and spent for the purposes of the economic development program in any amount and at any time at the discretion of the governing body of the city subject only to section 18-2716.

(4) The restrictions on the appropriation of funds from local sources of revenue shall not apply to the reappropriation of funds which were appropriated but not expended during previous fiscal years.

Laws 1991, LB 840, § 18;

Laws 1992, LB 719A, § 79;

Laws 1993, LB 732, § 24;

Laws 2000, LB 1258, § 1;

Laws 2011, LB471, § 4;

Laws 2018, LB614, § 1;

Laws 2021, LB163, § 193.